Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 5 Fees

42-9-90.
Application fee required for transfer consideration.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Adult” means both individuals legally classified as adults and juveniles treated as adults by court order, statute, or operation of law.

“Offender” means an adult placed under, or subject to supervision as the result of the commission of a criminal offense and released to the community under the jurisdiction of courts, paroling authorities, corrections, or other criminal justice agencies.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, or any other territorial possessions of the United States.

The department and the State Board of Pardons and Paroles shall be authorized to require any nonindigent adult offender to pay a $100.00 application fee when applying to transfer his or her supervision from Georgia to any other state or territory pursuant to the provisions of Articles 3 and 4 of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-9-90

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 477, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-91/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 608, § 5/SB 270.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “The department and the State Board of Pardons and Paroles shall be” for “The Department of Corrections and the State Board of Pardons and Paroles are” at the beginning of subsection (b). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2016 amendment,

effective May 3, 2016, substituted “pay a $100.00” for “pay a $25.00” near the middle of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).